Utah statutes.
23-19-12.7.   Instruction in bow hunter education -- Issuance of certificate of completion.

(1)  The division shall establish criteria for a bow hunter education course, which may be offered by any entity that meets the division's criteria.

(2)  The bow hunter education course shall include instruction in:

(a)  the safe use of bow hunting equipment;

(b)  fundamentals of bow hunting;

(c)  shooting and hunting techniques; and

(d)  hunter ethics.

(3)  The division shall issue a certificate of completion to a participant upon successful completion of a bow hunter education course which meets the requirements of this section and criteria established by the division.



Enacted by Chapter 166, 1998 General Session

